Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, HB2161.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Title 1, chapter 2, article 4, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended by adding section 1-273, to read: START_STATUTE1-273. Sovereign authority; natural resources; anticommandeering Pursuant to article II, section 3, Constitution of Arizona, this state, any agency or political subdivision of this state and any employee of this state or any agency or political subdivision of this state, including the arizona game and fish department and the department's employees and contractors, acting in the employee's official capacity may not use any personnel or financial resources to enforce, administer or cooperate with either of the following federal actions or programs: 1. the ENDANGERED species act of 1973 (P.L. 93-205; 87 Stat. 884; 16 United States code sections 1531 through 1544).  This paragraph does not apply to the livestock loss program that is administered and enforced by the Arizona livestock loss board. 2. The incidental take permit program pursuant to the endangered species act of 1973 (P.L. 93-205; 87 Stat. 884; 16 United States Code sections 1536 through 1539). END_STATUTE